California, session 20252026, SB523.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2059 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:2059. (a) Under a homeowners’ insurance policy, an insurer may differentiate the risk of an internal fire from the risk of an external fire for the purposes of determining coverage.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “External fire” means a fire that started outside of the insured property. An external fire may include, but is not limited to, wildfires or fires that began on a neighboring property that then spread to the insured property.(2) “Internal fire” means a fire that started within the insured property. An internal fire may include, but is not limited to, kitchen fires, electrical fires, or fires caused by negligence on the insured property.SECTION 1.Section 10089.56 is added to the Insurance Code, immediately following Section 10089.55, to read:10089.56.(a)The authority shall establish a commission, to convene no later than April 1, 2026, to consider expanding the authority.(b)The commission shall be composed of board members or their designees.(c)The commission shall explore both of the following:(1)Financial estimates for statewide earthquake threats.(2)Potential financial support from federal authorities in a worst-case scenario.(d)The commission shall conclude its work no later than April 1, 2027, and shall provide a report to the Legislature no later than June 1, 2027, on the feasibility of creating a disaster insurance program in California.(e)The commission shall be supported by authority staff. The department may provide additional staff if necessary.(f)(1) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2)Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on June 1, 2031.